Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2880
Delegated dispensing permit; criminal charges; when.

When appropriate, the Attorney General, with the recommendation of the board, shall initiate criminal charges against pharmacists or other persons who knowingly permit individuals dispensing pursuant to a delegated dispensing permit to perform professional duties which require the expertise or professional judgment of a pharmacist.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 55;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.47;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 976.